Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 2 Capacity of Parties

13-3-20.
Minors — Contracts for property or valuable consideration; contracts for necessaries.

Generally the contract of a minor is voidable. If in a contractual transaction a minor receives property or other valuable consideration and, after arrival at the age of 18, retains possession of such property or continues to enjoy the benefit of such other valuable consideration, the minor shall have thereby ratified or affirmed the contract and it shall be binding on him or her. Such contractual transaction shall also be binding upon any minor who becomes emancipated by operation of law or pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 11 of Title 15.

The contract of a minor for necessaries shall be binding on the minor as if the minor were 18 years of age except that the party furnishing them to the minor shall prove that the parent or guardian of such minor had failed or refused to supply sufficient necessaries for the minor, that the minor was emancipated by operation of law, or the minor was emancipated pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 11 of Title 15.

History.
Ga. L. 1858, p. 58, § 1; Code 1863, §§ 2691, 2693; Code 1868, §§ 2687, 2689; Code 1873, §§ 2729, 2731; Code 1882, §§ 2729, 2731; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3647, 3648; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4232, 4233; Code 1933, § 20-201; Ga. L. 1966, p. 291, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 640, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 193, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 141, § 3/HB 847; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-3/HB 242.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, substituted “Article 10” for “Article 6” in the last sentence of subsection (a) and near the end of subsection (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

13-3-21.
Minors — Contracts relating to practice of profession, trade, or business.

If a minor, by permission of his parent or guardian or by permission of law, practices any profession or trade or engages in any business as an adult, he shall be bound for all contracts connected with such profession, trade, or business.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2695; Code 1868, § 2691; Code 1873, § 2733; Code 1882, § 2733; Civil Code 1895, § 3650; Civil Code 1910, § 4235; Code 1933, § 20-203.

Section inapplicable to single transaction for sale of land. —

Rule which authorizes infant to make binding contract in connection with business in which the infant may be engaged, by permission of infant’s parent or guardian, as an adult, is not applicable to single transaction for sale of land. White v. Sikes, 129 Ga. 508, 59 S.E. 228, 1907 Ga. LEXIS 496 (1907).

13-3-22.
Minors — Marriage contracts and settlements.

Marriage contracts and settlements made by persons who are minors but of lawful age to marry are binding as if made by adults.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2696; Code 1868, § 2692; Code 1873, § 2734; Code 1882, § 2734; Civil Code 1895, § 3651; Civil Code 1910, § 4236; Code 1933, § 20-204.

Section provides exception to general disability of minors to contract. —

Exception to general rule as to contracts of infant, under age of majority but of lawful age to marry, is to make marriage contracts and settlements binding as if made by adults. Walker v. Walker, 209 Ga. 490, 74 S.E.2d 66, 1953 Ga. LEXIS 289 (1953).

Marriage does not remove disabilities of infancy unless so provided by statute.

Walker v. Walker, 209 Ga. 490, 74 S.E.2d 66, 1953 Ga. LEXIS 289 (1953).

Marriage contracts and settlements are prenuptial contracts and settlements.

Sellers v. Sellers, 160 Ga. 516, 128 S.E. 659, 1925 Ga. LEXIS 197 (1925).

13-3-23.
Minors — Contracts, promissory notes, written obligation, or other evidence, for loans from trust funds for educational purposes.

Any contract, promissory note, written obligation, or other evidence of indebtedness made and executed by a minor for a loan from any trust fund for educational purposes to any educational institution shall be as valid and binding as if said minor were sui juris at the time of making such contract or other obligation and otherwise capacitated to contract.

History.
Ga. L. 1911, p. 163, § 1; Code 1933, § 20-205.

13-3-24.
Insane, mentally ill, intellectually disabled, or mentally incompetent persons.

The contract of an insane, a mentally ill, an intellectually disabled, or a mentally incompetent person who has never been adjudicated to be insane, mentally ill, intellectually disabled, or mentally incompetent to the extent that he is incapable of managing his estate as prescribed by this Code is not absolutely void but only voidable, except that a contract made by such person during a lucid interval is valid without ratification.

After the fact that a person is insane, mentally ill, intellectually disabled, or mentally incompetent to the extent that he is incapable of managing his estate has been established by a court of competent jurisdiction in this state and the affairs of such person are vested in a guardian, the power of such person to contract, even though restored to sanity, shall be entirely gone; any contracts made by such person shall be absolutely void until the guardianship is dissolved. One may recover for necessaries furnished an insane person, a mentally ill person, an intellectually disabled person, or a mentally incompetent person upon the same proof as if furnished to minors.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2691, 2697; Code 1868, §§ 2687, 2693; Code 1873, §§ 2729, 2735; Code 1882, §§ 2729, 2735; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3647, 3652; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4232, 4237; Code 1933, § 20-206; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 4-17/HB 252.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “an intellectually disabled,” for “a mentally retarded” and “intellectually disabled” for “mentally retarded” in subsections (a) and (b).

13-3-25.
Intoxicated persons.

A contract made by an intoxicated person is not void, though the intoxication is brought about by the other party, but is merely voidable at the election of the intoxicated person and may be ratified by him expressly or by conduct inconsistent with its rescission.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2691, 2699; Code 1868, §§ 2687, 2695; Code 1873, §§ 2729, 2737; Code 1882, §§ 2729, 2737; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3647, 3654; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4232, 4239; Code 1933, § 20-207.